Wyoming, session 2026, HB0045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlv)(A), (B), (C)(II)
and by creating new subparagraphs (D) and (E) is amended to
read:
39-11-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
(xlv) A portion of property used as a primary
residence by long-term homeowners as provided in this
paragraph. The following shall apply to this exemption:
(A) For residential real property used as a
primary residence, if the owner or their spouse is
sixty-five (65) years of age or older and the owner or
their spouse has paid residential property tax in Wyoming
for twenty-five (25) years or more on any residential
property, the amount of the exemption shall be fifty
percent (50%) of the assessed value fair market value of
the residential real property, provided that the exemption
shall only apply to the first three million dollars
($3,000,000.00) of the fair market value of the residential
real property;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Except as provided by subdivision
(C)(II) of this paragraph, not more than one (1) exemption
under this paragraph shall apply to the same property in
any year and no owner shall claim more than one (1)
exemption under this paragraph in any year including
property that houses more than one (1) family. To claim an
exemption under this paragraph the owner of the residential
real property shall submit a claim to the county assessor
not later than the fourth Monday in May March 1 each year
on forms provided by the department of revenue
demonstrating that the person is the owner of the property,
that the person or the person's spouse is sixty-five (65)
years of age or older and has paid residential property tax
in Wyoming for twenty-five (25) years or more on any
residential property and that the property is the person's
primary residence. A surviving spouse of a person who
qualified under this paragraph and who would not otherwise
qualify under this paragraph shall continue to qualify for
the exemption under this paragraph. False claims are
punishable as provided by W.S. 6-5-303;
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(II) "Primary residence" means
residential real property in Wyoming where the person
claiming the exemption actually resides for not less than
eight (8) months of the year. If a primary residence is
sold and another property is purchased within the state of
Wyoming, the months residing in both owner-occupied
residences shall apply to the requirements of this
exemption;
(D) After filing a sworn claim pursuant to
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, in subsequent years the
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
claimant shall remain qualified for the tax exemption
provided by this paragraph if the claimant contacts the
assessor's office by telephone, mail or other communication
method on or before March 1 and confirms that the claimant
continues to meet the requirements set forth in this
paragraph;
(E) If the secretary of state certifies to
the department of revenue that the voters have approved an
initiative implementing a homeowner's property tax
exemption and the exemption is enacted into law, an owner
who qualifies and applies for an exemption under this
paragraph shall not qualify for the exemption under the
initiative.
Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 106,
Section 2 is repealed.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4